Vermont statutes. Title 28 Public Institutions and Corrections
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 200.
Purpose of probation.

It is the policy of this State that the purpose of probation is to rehabilitate offenders, reduce the risk that they will commit a subsequent offense, and protect the safety of the victim and the community.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 24

, § 1.

§ 201.
Definitions.

Whenever used in this chapter, unless a different meaning plainly is required, “probation” means a procedure under which a respondent, found guilty of a crime upon verdict or plea, is released by the court, without confinement, subject to conditions imposed by the court and subject to the supervision of the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.

§ 202.
Powers and responsibilities of the Commissioner regarding probation.

The Commissioner shall be charged with the following powers and responsibilities regarding the administration of probation:

To maintain general supervision of persons placed on probation, and to prescribe rules, consistent with any orders of the court, governing the conduct of such persons.

To supervise the administration of probation services and establish policies and standards and make rules regarding probation investigation, supervision, case work and case loads, record keeping, and the qualification of probation officers.

To use electronic monitoring equipment such as global position monitoring, automated voice recognition telephone equipment, and transdermal alcohol monitoring equipment to enable more effective or efficient supervision of individuals placed on probation. Transdermal alcohol monitoring equipment shall be used for such purposes as discouraging persons whose licenses have been suspended for DUI from operating motor vehicles on Vermont highways.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20; amended

2007, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 203.
Probation warrant.

Whenever a probationer is placed in the custody of the Commissioner, the court shall furnish the Commissioner with a warrant setting forth the name of the probationer, the nature of the crime of which he or she was convicted, the date and place of trial and sentence, the sentence imposed, the order of the court committing him or her to the charge of the Commissioner, and the conditions of his or her release.

The warrant shall be full authority for the exercise by the Commissioner of all the rights and powers over and in relation to the probationer prescribed by law and by the order of the court.

The warrant shall be sufficient authority for the apprehension and detention of the probationer by the Commissioner or by any officer acting under his or her direction at any time or place.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.

§ 204.
Submission of written report; protection of records.

A court, before which a person is being prosecuted for any crime, may in its discretion order the Commissioner to submit a written report as to the circumstances of the alleged offense and the character and previous criminal history record of the person, with recommendation. If the presentence investigation report is being prepared in connection with a person’s conviction for a sex offense that requires registration pursuant to 13 V.S.A. chapter 167, subchapter 3, the Commissioner shall obtain information pertaining to the person’s juvenile record, if any, in accordance with

33 V.S.A. §§ 5117

and 5119(f)(6), and any deferred sentences received for a registrable sex offense in accordance with

13 V.S.A. § 7041(h)

, and include such information in the presentence investigation report.

The court shall order such a report to be made before imposing sentence when the respondent is adjudged guilty of a felony, except as otherwise provided by rules of the Supreme Court. If the report has been made to any court within the State within a period of two years with reference to such individual, in connection with the same or another offense, submission of a copy of that report may fulfill the requirements of this section, if the court to which the report is to be submitted approves. Upon request, the Commissioner shall furnish a State’s Attorney with a copy of any report made within the State once sentence has been passed in connection with the offense for which the report was made.

The report ordered by the court under this section or section 204a of this title shall be made not less than one week nor more than three weeks from the date of the order. This three-week limit may be extended by order of the court.

Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, any presentence investigation report or parole summary prepared by any employee of the Department in the discharge of the employee’s official duty, except as provided in subdivision 204a(b)(5) and section 205 of this title, is confidential and shall not be disclosed to anyone outside the Department other than the judge or the Parole Board.
(d) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, any presentence investigation report or parole summary prepared by any employee of the Department in the discharge of the employee’s official duty, except as provided in subdivision 204a(b)(5) and section 205 of this title, is confidential and shall not be disclosed to anyone outside the Department other than the judge or the Parole Board.

The court or Board shall permit inspection of the presentence investigation report or parole summary, redacted of information that may compromise the safety or confidentiality of any person, by the State’s Attorney and by the defendant or inmate or his or her attorney; and
(2) (A) The court or Board shall permit inspection of the presentence investigation report or parole summary, redacted of information that may compromise the safety or confidentiality of any person, by the State’s Attorney and by the defendant or inmate or his or her attorney; and

the court or Board may, in its discretion, permit the inspection of the presentence investigation report or parole summary or parts thereof by other persons having a proper interest in the report or parole summary, whenever the best interests or welfare of the defendant or inmate makes that action desirable or helpful.

The presentence investigation report ordered by the court under this section or section 204a of this title shall include the comments or written statement of the victim, or the victim’s guardian or next of kin if the victim is incompetent or deceased, whenever the victim or the victim’s guardian or next of kin choose to submit comments or a written statement.

Except as otherwise provided by law, reports and records subject to this section may be inspected, pursuant to a court order issued ex parte, by a State or federal prosecutor as part of a criminal investigation if the court finds that the records may be relevant to the investigation. The information in the files may be used for any lawful purpose but shall not otherwise be made public.

The presentence investigation report ordered by the court under this section or section 204a of this title shall set forth information concerning the defendant’s custodial relationships pursuant to

13 V.S.A. § 7030

.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20; amended

1973, No. 109

, § 10, eff. May 25, 1973;

1981, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

1989, No. 293

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1995, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1996;

2005, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 26, 2006;

2009, No. 1

, § 35;

2009, No. 58

, § 19;

2013, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. June 3, 2014;

2015, No. 29

, § 21;

2015, No. 137

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 25, 2016;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 169;

2021, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 204a.
Sex offenders; presentence investigations; risk assessments; psychosexual evaluations.

The Department of Corrections shall conduct a presentence investigation for all persons convicted of:

lewd and lascivious conduct in violation of

13 V.S.A. § 2601

;

lewd and lascivious conduct with a child in violation of

13 V.S.A. § 2602

;

sexual assault in violation of

13 V.S.A. § 3252

;

aggravated sexual assault in violation of

13 V.S.A. § 3253

;

aggravated sexual assault of a child in violation of

13 V.S.A. § 3253

a

;

kidnapping with intent to commit sexual assault in violation of

13 V.S.A. § 2405(a)(1)(D)

; or

an offense involving sexual exploitation of children in violation of 13 V.S.A. chapter 64.

A presentence investigation required by this section:

Shall include an assessment of the offender’s risk of reoffense and a determination of whether the person is a high-risk offender.

Shall include a psychosexual evaluation if so ordered by the court.

Shall include information regarding the offender’s records maintained by the Department for Children and Families in the Child Protection Registry pursuant to

33 V.S.A. § 4916

if the offender was previously substantiated for child abuse or neglect.

Shall include information, if any, regarding any deferred sentences received by the offender for a registrable sex offense in accordance with

13 V.S.A. § 7041(h)

.

Shall be completed before the defendant is sentenced. Upon completion, the Department shall submit copies of the presentence investigation to the court, the State’s Attorney, the defendant’s attorney, and the Department for Children and Families. Copies of a presentence investigation authorized by this subdivision shall remain privileged and are not subject to public inspection.

The Department of Corrections shall prepare a recommendation for programming and treatment for all persons for whom a presentence investigation is required under subsection (a) of this section. The Department shall consider the information contained in the presentence investigation when recommending the programming and treatment appropriate for the offender.
(c) (1) The Department of Corrections shall prepare a recommendation for programming and treatment for all persons for whom a presentence investigation is required under subsection (a) of this section. The Department shall consider the information contained in the presentence investigation when recommending the programming and treatment appropriate for the offender.

The recommendation required by this subdivision shall address the issue of the availability of appropriate treatment programs within correctional facilities and on an outpatient basis in the community, including recommendation as to the defendant’s eligibility for such treatment programs, and shall include a statement of the relevant policies of the Department of Corrections regarding parole recommendations for the offense of which the offender was convicted.

The court may order the Department to provide a report including:
(3) (A) The court may order the Department to provide a report including:

the minimum and maximum sentences necessary to permit admission of the offender to any of the available treatment programs; and

the results of a preassessment of the offender.

A preassessment under this subdivision shall consist of:

an interview with the defendant;

an assessment of the offender’s risk level;

completion of testing and any other steps necessary to make an appropriate programming decision for the defendant;

identification of the treatment program within a correctional facility to which the offender will be referred based on the information available at the time of sentencing, provided the defendant agrees to treatment and is sentenced to a term which permits participation in the program.

Except as provided in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision (C), the Department shall provide a report to the court under this subdivision within 60 days after it is ordered.
(C) (i) Except as provided in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision (C), the Department shall provide a report to the court under this subdivision within 60 days after it is ordered.

If the Department requires a psychosexual evaluation in order to determine whether the offender will be admitted into any of the available treatment programs, the Department shall complete the evaluation and provide it to the court along with its report within 90 days after the report is ordered.

The requirement that a presentence investigation be performed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall not be interpreted to prohibit the performance of a presentence investigation, psychosexual evaluation, or risk assessment at any other time during the proceeding, including prior to the entry of a plea agreement or prior to sentencing for a violation of probation.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to infringe in any manner upon the Department’s authority to make decisions about programming for defendants or to create a right on the part of the offender to receive treatment in a particular program.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. May 26, 2006;

2009, No. 1

, § 36.

§ 204b.
High-risk sex offenders.

A person who is sentenced to an incarcerative sentence for a violation of any of the offenses listed in subsection 204a(a) of this title and who is designated by the Department of Corrections as high-risk pursuant to

13 V.S.A. § 5411b

while serving his or her sentence shall not be eligible for parole, furlough, or any other type of early release until the expiration of 70 percent of his or her maximum sentence.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 1

, § 44.

§ 205.
Probation.

After passing sentence, a court may suspend all or part of the sentence and place the person so sentenced in the care and custody of the Commissioner upon such conditions and for such time as it may prescribe in accordance with law or until further order of court.
(a) (1) After passing sentence, a court may suspend all or part of the sentence and place the person so sentenced in the care and custody of the Commissioner upon such conditions and for such time as it may prescribe in accordance with law or until further order of court.

The term of probation for misdemeanors shall be for a specific term not to exceed two years unless the court, in its sole discretion, specifically finds that the interests of justice require a longer or an indefinite period of probation.

The term of probation for nonviolent felonies shall not exceed four years or the statutory maximum term of imprisonment for the offense, whichever is less, unless the court, in its sole discretion, specifically finds that the interests of justice require a longer or an indefinite period of probation.
(3) (A) The term of probation for nonviolent felonies shall not exceed four years or the statutory maximum term of imprisonment for the offense, whichever is less, unless the court, in its sole discretion, specifically finds that the interests of justice require a longer or an indefinite period of probation.

As used in this subdivision, “nonviolent felonies” means an offense that is not:

a listed crime as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 5301(7)

; or

an offense involving sexual exploitation of children in violation of 13 V.S.A. chapter 64.

Nothing in this subsection shall prevent the court from terminating the period of probation and discharging a person pursuant to section 251 of this title.

The probation officer of a person on probation for a specific term shall review the person’s case file during probation and, not less than 45 days prior to the expiration of the probation term, may file a petition with the court requesting the court to extend the period of probation for a specific term not to exceed one year in order to provide the person the opportunity to complete programming consistent with special conditions of probation. A hearing on the petition for an extension of probation under this subsection shall comply with the procedures set forth in Rule 32.1 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure.

At or before the sentencing hearing, the prosecutor’s office shall inform the victim of the midpoint review process for probationers, and that the defendant may be eligible for early discharge from probation pursuant to sections 251 and 252 of this title.
(b) (1) At or before the sentencing hearing, the prosecutor’s office shall inform the victim of the midpoint review process for probationers, and that the defendant may be eligible for early discharge from probation pursuant to sections 251 and 252 of this title.

The victim of a listed crime as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 5301(7)

for which the offender has been placed on probation shall have the right to request and receive from the Department of Corrections information regarding the offender’s general compliance with the specific conditions of probation. Nothing in this section shall require the Department of Corrections to disclose any confidential information revealed by the offender in connection with participation in a treatment program.

Unless the court in its discretion finds that the interests of justice require additional standard and special conditions of probation, when the court orders a specific term of probation for a qualifying offense, the offender shall be placed on administrative probation, which means that the only conditions of probation shall be that the probationer:
(c) (1) Unless the court in its discretion finds that the interests of justice require additional standard and special conditions of probation, when the court orders a specific term of probation for a qualifying offense, the offender shall be placed on administrative probation, which means that the only conditions of probation shall be that the probationer:

register with the Department of Corrections’ probation and parole office in his or her district;

notify the probation officer of his or her current address each month;

within 72 hours, notify the Department of Corrections if probable cause is found for a criminal offense during the term of probation; and

not be convicted of a criminal offense during the term of probation.

As used in this subsection, “qualifying offense” means:

Unlawful mischief under

13 V.S.A. § 3701

.

Retail theft under

13 V.S.A. §§ 2575

and 2577.

Operating after suspension or revocation of license under

23 V.S.A. § 674(a)

.

Bad checks under

13 V.S.A. § 2022

.

Theft of services under

13 V.S.A. § 2582

.

Disorderly conduct under

13 V.S.A. § 1026

, unless the original charge was a listed offense as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 5301(7)

.

Theft of rented property under

13 V.S.A. § 2591

.

Operation without consent of owner under

23 V.S.A. § 1094(a)

.

Petit larceny under

13 V.S.A. § 2502

.

Negligent operation of a motor vehicle under

23 V.S.A. § 1091(a)

.

False reports to law enforcement under

13 V.S.A. § 1754

.

Setting fires under

13 V.S.A. § 508

.

[Repealed.]

Simple assault by mutual consent under

13 V.S.A. § 1023(b)

unless the original charge was a listed offense as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 5301(7)

.

Unlawful trespass under

13 V.S.A. § 3705(a)

.

A first offense of possession under

18 V.S.A. § 4230(a)(1)

.

Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a court from requiring participation in the Restorative Justice Program established in chapter 12 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20; amended

1995, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1996;

1999, No. 4

, § 4;

2003, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 3, 2004;

2005, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. May 26, 2006;

2007, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § D5;

2015, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. May 31, 2016;

2021, No. 24

, § 2.

§ 206.
Expenses of probationer.

When a person is placed on probation, the Commissioner may expend such sums as deemed necessary for the temporary support of the person, his or her traveling expenses, or other purposes consistent with the policies of the Department regarding probationers.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.

§ 207.
Final judgment.

Notwithstanding the fact that a sentence to probation can subsequently be modified or revoked in accordance with subchapters 2 and 3 of this chapter, a judgment that includes such a sentence shall constitute a final judgment for all other purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.